Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
CHAPTER 45 Budget and Financial Administration

45.0005.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter:

“Branch budget bill” shall have the same meaning as in KRS

48.010

;

“Document” means any physical embodiment of information or ideas, regardless of form or characteristic, including electronic versions thereof;

“Warrant” means a printed or electronic authorization from the Finance and Administration Cabinet for the State Treasurer to issue a check; and

“Writing” or “written” means letters, words, or numbers, or their equivalent, set down by handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing, magnetic impulse, mechanical or electronic recording, or other form of data compilation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 118, § 15, effective July 15, 1998; ch. 120, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2009, ch. 78, § 30, effective June 25, 2009.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/98). This section was created by 1998 Ky. Acts chs. 118 and 120 which have been codified together. Section 15 of Acts ch. 118 is substantively identical to subsection (3) of Section 5 of Acts ch. 120.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Transportation Cabinet Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 214, Pt. I, A, 4, (8) at 2019.

45.001.
Capital Development Committee.

The Capital Development Committee is created. The committee shall ensure the proper coordination of state government initiatives which impact the City of Frankfort and Franklin County government and are unique to the seat of state government.

The committee shall meet at least semiannually at a time and place announced by the chairperson.

The membership of the committee shall consist of the following members or their designees:

The mayor of the city of Frankfort;

The county judge/executive of Franklin County;

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet;

The secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet;

The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet;

The commissioner of the Kentucky Department of Tourism;

The chairman of the Frankfort/Franklin County Tourist and Convention Commission;

A citizen at large, who is a resident of Franklin County, appointed by the Franklin County judge/executive; and

A citizen at large, who is a resident of Frankfort, appointed by the mayor of the city of Frankfort.

The citizen-at-large members of the committee shall be appointed to a term of four (4) years each.

The Governor shall appoint the chairperson of the committee.

Members of the committee shall serve without compensation.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide administrative support to the committee.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 25, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 194, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 83, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 60, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 95, § 11, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 211, § 12, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 9, effective June 25, 2009; 2009, ch. 16, § 6, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; 2022 ch. 236, § 18, effective July 1, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(2), one or more references to the “Kentucky Department of Travel and Tourism” in this statute have been changed in codification to the “Kentucky Department of Tourism” to reflect the reorganization of certain parts of the Executive Branch, as set forth in Executive Order 2016-856 and confirmed by the General Assembly in 2017 Ky. Acts ch. 110.

45.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

45.011.
Capital outlay and printing — Contracts in anticipation of appropriations.

The Governor, the Chief Justice, and the Legislative Research Commission, or their designees may grant special authority for their budget units, during any fiscal year, to enter into contracts for capital outlay or for state printing, in anticipation of appropriations already made for the ensuing fiscal year or biennium. Contracts made before the close of a fiscal year under such authority shall be treated as deferred charges to the appropriations and expenses of the next fiscal year or biennium. The grant of such authority and a report of all contracts made under this section shall be reported to the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 41, effective July 1, 1983.

45.020.
Expenditures to be authorized by appropriation acts — Refund of funds illegally received. [Repealed.]

45.021.
Contracts for municipal services to state agencies by city of Frankfort.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet, within budgetary limits fixed by any appropriations made by the General Assembly for such purpose, shall contract with the city of Frankfort for the provision by the city to state agencies located at the seat of government for fire and police protection of state-owned property and other municipal services as are provided by the city to commercial and industrial taxpayers residing in the city of Frankfort.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 47, effective July 1, 1983.

45.030.
Biennial budget report to be prepared. [Repealed.]

45.031.
Federal funds — State clearinghouse function.

Any department, board, commission, agency, advisory council, interstate compact, corporate body, or instrumentality of the Commonwealth of Kentucky applying for federal funds, aids, loans, or grants shall file a summary notification of the intended application with the Department for Local Government in accordance with the existing A-95 procedures.

When as a condition to receiving federal funds, the Commonwealth of Kentucky is required to match the federal funds, a statement shall be filed with the notice of intent or summary of the application stating:

The amount and source of state funds needed for matching purposes;

The length of time the matching funds shall be required;

The growth of the program;

How the program will be evaluated;

What action will be necessary should the federal funds be canceled, curtailed, or restricted; and

Any other financial and program management data required by the Finance and Administration Cabinet or by law.

Any application for federal funds, aids, loans, or grants which will require state matching or replacement funds at the time of application or at any time in the future, must be approved by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Legislative Research Commission, and the Chief Justice for their respective branches of government or their designated agents prior to its filing with the appropriate federal agency. Any application for federal funds, aids, loans, or grants which will require state matching or replacement funds at the time of application or at any time in the future, when funds have not been appropriated for that express purpose, must be approved by the General Assembly, if in session. When the General Assembly is not in session, the application shall be reported to and reviewed by the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, as provided by KRS 48.500(3).

When any federal funds, aids, loans, or grants are received by any department, board, commission or agency of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, a report of the amount of funds received shall be filed with the Finance and Administration Cabinet; and this report shall specify the amount of funds which would reimburse an agency for indirect costs as provided for under OMB Circular A-87.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may refuse to issue his warrant for the disbursement of any state or federal funds from the State Treasury as the result of any application which is not approved as provided by this section, or in regard to which the statement or reports required by this section were not filed.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall be responsible for the orderly administration of this section and for issuing the appropriate guidelines and regulations from each source of fund used.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 49, effective July 1, 1983; 1994, ch. 508, § 14, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 69, § 16, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 27, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 33, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 73, § 5, effective June 8, 2011.

45.040.
Contents of biennial budget report. [Repealed.]

45.045.
Budget recommendations. [Repealed.]

45.046.
Picked-up employee pension contributions not considered an increase or decrease in employee salaries.

The pick up of employee pension contributions pursuant to Acts 1982, ch. 166, shall not be construed as either an increase or a decrease in the amount budgeted for employee salaries by the state or any other employer affected by Acts 1982, ch. 166.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 166, § 14, effective July 15, 1982.

45.050.
Appropriation and revenue acts — Adoption — Questions of interpretation. [Repealed.]

45.060.
Forms for budget estimates. [Repealed.]

45.070.
Estimates to be submitted by heads of budget units. [Repealed.]

45.080.
Continuous financial planning. [Repealed.]

45.090.
Duties of governor in preparation of budget report — Governor-elect to be informed. [Repealed.]

45.100.
Budget report to be printed and transmitted to house of representatives. [Repealed.]

45.101.
Expense accounts of state officers and employees — Receipts — Authority to promulgate administrative regulations.

Except as otherwise provided by law, each state officer or employee who is authorized by law to receive, from corporations or from the State Treasury or from any fund appropriated out of the State Treasury, traveling or other expenses incident to the discharge of official duties shall submit to the Finance and Administration Cabinet information regarding the expenses and necessary receipts as provided by administrative regulation promulgated by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, provided that any expenses in excess of ten dollars ($10) shall be accompanied by a receipt, unless the Finance and Administration Cabinet increases the minimum expense amount for which a receipt is required as provided in this section. The required information and documentation shall be provided before the cabinet shall audit or pay the expenses. The Finance and Administration Cabinet may promulgate an administrative regulation to increase the minimum expense amount for which a receipt is required, not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25). The Finance and Administration Cabinet may rely on a preaudit performed by the budget unit as a basis for issuing a warrant.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to permit budget units to contract with airlines, railroads, hotels, or other companies for services to a group of their employees while on official travel status. The expenses are to be submitted to the Finance and Administration Cabinet on forms prescribed by the Finance and Administration Cabinet before the cabinet shall audit or pay the expenses.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to permit state officers or employees to assign their claim for reimbursement of travel expenses to airline, railroad, hotel, or other companies in payment of services rendered as provided for in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

Each state officer or employee who by reason of the duties assigned to the officer’s or employee’s office is required to be at the state capital for the majority of the time, or who has an office located at the state capital, shall not be permitted to charge for expenses except from the state capital to the place where the business the officer or employee is transacting is to be transacted, and from that place back to the state capital, and each officer or employee who is assigned to duty at some place other than the state capital shall only be permitted to charge to the state such expenses as are incurred in going from that place to the place where the business is transacted, and returning. Expenses in going from the state capital or the place where the officer or employee is assigned to duty to the officer’s or employee’s real place of residence, or in return therefrom, shall not be allowed unless it is shown that it was necessary for the officer or employee to make the trip in the discharge of business for the state.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to permit the payment of travel and other expenses incidental to the official activities of formally organized groups sponsored by or otherwise representing state agencies. The payment may be made direct to service establishments in the manner set forth in subsection (3) of this section, by an inter-account bill between budget units, or by reimbursement to the official or other employee who has been designated as the officer-in-charge of the organized group. If it is necessary that one (1) or more state employees or officials travel with the group, their expenses may be included in the total expenses for the group.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations allowing heads of budget units to establish imprest cash funds for reimbursement of travel expenses.

Except as provided in KRS Chapter 6, but the provisions of any other laws to the contrary notwithstanding, and in lieu of the reimbursement of travel and other incidental expenses authorized by subsection (1) of this section, the Finance and Administration Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to provide for the payment of a fixed expense allowance per day to be established by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, plus necessary travel expenses, to each state officer or employee who is authorized by law to be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the discharge of official duties. This payment shall be made from an appropriation for this purpose to a budget unit of a branch of government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 42, effective July 1, 1983; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 16, effective May 30, 1997.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. III, 34 at 1752.

45.110.
Representative of department of finance to serve appropriations committees. [Repealed.]

45.111.
Refund of funds illegally received.

Any funds received into the State Treasury which are later determined not to be due to the state may be refunded to the person who paid such funds into the Treasury. The Finance and Administration Cabinet may issue a warrant to disburse the funds upon a request from the budget unit that originally received and deposited the funds. The request for refund must be approved by the head of the budget unit or his designated assistant. The Finance and Administration Cabinet may require any documentation deemed necessary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 43, effective July 1, 1983.

45.120.
Appropriation of preceding year, when continued. [Repealed.]

45.121.
Examination of claims — Preaudit by budget unit — Compromise of claims.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall examine all authorizations for payment presented, and if it finds them correct shall file them and issue warrants upon the State Treasurer. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall not certify any claim to the State Treasurer until it is satisfied that there is in the appropriation to the budget unit against which the claim is chargeable, a sufficient amount to pay the claim. The Finance and Administration Cabinet may rely on the preaudit performed by a budget unit as a basis for issuing a warrant.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Chief Justice, and the Legislative Research Commission with the approval of the Attorney General, may authorize the compromise of any disputed claim by or against their respective branches of government. In the event of a claim against the Commonwealth which cannot be ascribed to a particular branch of government or budget unit thereof, with the approval of the Attorney General, it may be compromised by agreement among them.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 44, effective July 1, 1983.

45.130.
Transfer of appropriations and allotments.
[Repealed.]

45.131.
Investigations of mismanagement of branches of government.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Chief Justice, and the Legislative Research Commission for their respective branches of government shall investigate any alleged mismanagement of any of the affairs of the state by any officer, employee, or governing body responsible within their respective branches of government for the carrying out of any state function or the management of state funds and shall recommend the removal of any unnecessary officer or employee and of any officer or employee who they find has grossly mismanaged any state affairs within their respective branches of government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 45, effective July 1, 1983.

45.140.
Revolving trust and agency accounts — Charges for services by agencies. [Repealed.]

45.141.
Agency fund account for department of agriculture. [Repealed.]

45.142.
Enforcement of laws — Investigation procedure.

For the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter and those sections of KRS Chapters 41, 45, and 48 relating to the state budget and financial administration, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Chief Justice, and the Legislative Research Commission, for their respective branches of government, or any officer or employee designated by them, shall have free access during business hours to all books, reports, papers, and accounts in the office or under the care or control of any budget unit of their respective branches of government, and may administer oaths, certify to official acts, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of testimony touching any subject properly under investigation by them, and may compel the production of books, papers, and accounts. If any person fails to comply with the order of, or to obey a subpoena issued by them or their designated agents, or refuses to testify as a witness to any matters regarding which he may be lawfully interrogated, the judge having jurisdiction of the person to whom the order or subpoena was issued may, on their application compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of a subpoena or order issued from such court or a refusal to testify therein, and may adjudge such person guilty of contempt of court and punish him as provided by law in other contempt cases.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 46, effective July 1, 1983.

45.149.
Audit of budget unit by Auditor of Public Accounts — Contract for audit by certified public accountant.

A budget unit of any branch of government may request that an audit be performed by the Auditor of Public Accounts. Such request shall be in writing and shall include a statement of the scope and nature of the proposed audit.

No budget unit shall enter into any contract with a certified public accountant for an audit unless the Auditor of Public Accounts has declined in writing to perform the audit or has failed to respond within fifteen (15) days of receipt of a written request for an audit. Any contract with a certified public accountant entered into as a result of the Auditor of Public Accounts declining to perform the audit shall specify the following:

The certified public accountant shall forward a copy of the audit report and management letters to the Auditor of Public Accounts and to the Legislative Research Commission; and,

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall have the right to review the certified public accountant’s work papers.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 48, effective July 1, 1983; 1998, ch. 120, § 6, effective July 15, 1998.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 22, (1) at 1646.

45.150.
Capital outlays, how authorized. [Repealed.]

45.151.
Certain projects are subject to KRS Chapter 56.

All capital construction projects or capital outlays for the improvement of land or the construction, alteration, reconstruction, or major repair of any building or other structure, or sewage disposal or water supply system, or any bridge or road except a road and bridge under the jurisdiction of the Department of Highways, authorized under this chapter shall be subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 56.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 174, § 2; Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1).

45.155.
Contract between state and city of Frankfort for municipal services to state agencies. [Repealed.]

45.160.
Allotment of appropriations — Deviations. [Repealed.]

45.170.
Disbursements, how authorized — Vouchers. [Repealed.]

45.180.
Expense accounts of state officers and employees. [Repealed.]

45.185.
Establishment of air travel credit plan and other credit plans. [Repealed.]

45.190.
Unauthorized obligations — Current inventories of supplies and equipment. [Repealed.]

45.200.
Contracts for capital outlay or printing in anticipation of appropriations. [Repealed.]

45.210.
Statements of indebtedness, how presented; forms. [Repealed.]

45.220.
Examination of claims — Preaudit by budget unit — Compromise of disputed claims. [Repealed.]

45.229.
Appropriations — Lapsing.

No state officer or budget unit shall, after the close of any fiscal year, incur, or vote, order, or approve the incurring of, any obligation or expenditure under any appropriation for that fiscal year, and no expenditure shall be made from or charged to any appropriation for any fiscal year that has expired at the time the obligation of the expenditure was incurred.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet may, for a period of thirty (30) days after the close of any fiscal year, draw warrants against the available balances of appropriations made for that fiscal year, for the payment of expenditures incurred during that year or in fulfillment of contracts properly made during that year, but for no other purpose. Except as provided in KRS

48.705

, after the expiration of thirty (30) days from the beginning of each fiscal year, all balances of appropriations for the prior fiscal year shall lapse to the surplus account of the general fund or road fund unless a branch budget bill provides that the appropriation from which the expenditures shall be paid does not lapse. No further payments shall be made on any claims on account of expenditures of the prior fiscal year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 36, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 507, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1995 (3rd Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 2, effective November 3, 1995.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Judicial Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 162, Pt. I, A, 1, c, (1) at 981.

See Judicial Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 162, Pt. III, 5 at 983.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 14, (1) at 1642.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 27, (5) at 1652.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 28, (5) at 1652.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 30, (1) at 1653.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, B, 1, (2) at 1654.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, B, 1, (4) at 1654.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, B, 1, (12) at 1655.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (6) at 1659.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 3, (7) at 1660.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, D, 6, b, (2) at 1663.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, D, 7, (1) at 1664.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 1, (11) at 1683.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 2, (9) at 1683.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (8) at 1688.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (12) at 1689.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (6) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 2, (14) at 1694.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 11, (6) at 1699.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, K, 1, (1) at 1699.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, K, 8, (2) at 1701.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, K, 8, (3) at 1701.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, K, 8, (4) at 1701.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. II, (2) at 1706.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. III, 36 at 1753.

See Legislative Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 200, Pt. I, A at 1764.

See Transportation Cabinet Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 214, Pt. I, A, 4, (5) at 2017.

See Transportation Cabinet Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 214, Pt. I, A, 4, (9) at 2019.

See Transportation Cabinet Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 214, Pt. I, A, 4, (14) at 2019.

45.230.
Lapsing of appropriations. [Repealed.]

45.231.
Payment of prior year claims.

Any claim against any agency, department, or budget unit not presented or encumbered for payment within the fiscal year in which the obligation was incurred may, after determination by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, be found to be a valid claim against the Commonwealth, and may be authorized for payment out of the appropriation for the prior year claims, provided that the agency, department, or budget unit had an available balance sufficient to pay the obligation at the close of the fiscal year in which the obligation was incurred. All claims authorized to be paid under this section shall be limited to those incurred during the two (2) preceding fiscal years, and the total of such claims paid for any one (1) agency, department, or budget unit shall not exceed the available balance remaining to the credit of such agency, department, or budget unit at the close of the fiscal year in which the obligations were incurred.

Any claim incurred against any revolving, trust or agency fund account of any department or agency and authorized to be paid under subsection (1) of this section shall be charged against the current balance to the credit in such revolving, trust or agency fund account, and not the general expenditure fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 104; 1954, ch. 244, § 3, effective July 1, 1954; 1982, ch. 240, § 2, effective July 15, 1982.

45.235.
Social security appropriations not to lapse at end of first fiscal year of biennium. [Repealed.]

45.236.
Child welfare appropriations not to lapse.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

45.229

and notwithstanding any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, any unexpended or unencumbered balance of any Social Security appropriation, made available for expenditure by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in the administration of its child welfare functions for the first fiscal year of each biennium, remaining at the end of that fiscal year, shall be carried forward and be available for expenditure at any time during the ensuing fiscal year within the biennium and no portion shall lapse to the general expenditure fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 9; 1970, ch. 92, § 15; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(1); 1984, ch. 111, § 38, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 426, § 84, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 105, effective June 20, 2005.